Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4041.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 7u. (1) The principal residence of a person who, in the
judgment of the supervisor and board of review, by reason of
poverty, is unable to contribute toward the public charges is
eligible for exemption in whole or in part from the collection of
taxes under this act. This section does not apply to the property
of a corporation.
(2) To be eligible for exemption under this section, a person
shall, must, subject to subsections (6) , (8), and (10), and (9),
do all of the following on an annual basis:
JHM H01408'25 (H-3) b9mag0


(a) Own and occupy as a principal residence the property for
which an exemption is requested. The person shall must affirm this
ownership and occupancy status in writing by filing a form
prescribed by the state tax commission with the local assessing
unit.
(b) File a claim with the board of review on a form prescribed
by the state tax commission and provided by the local assessing
unit, accompanied by federal and state income tax returns for all
persons residing in the principal residence, including any property
tax credit returns, filed in the immediately preceding year or in
the current year. Federal and state income tax returns are not
required for a person residing in the principal residence if that
person was not required to file a federal or state income tax
return in the tax year in which the exemption under this section is
claimed or in the immediately preceding tax year. If a person was
not required to file a federal or state income tax return in the
tax year in which the exemption under this section is claimed or in
the immediately preceding tax year, an affidavit in a form
prescribed by the state tax commission may be accepted in place of
the federal or state income tax return. The filing of a claim under
this subsection constitutes an appearance before the board of
review for the purpose of preserving the claimant's right to appeal
the decision of the board of review regarding the claim.
(c) Produce a valid driver license or other form of
identification if requested by the supervisor or board of review.
(d) Produce a deed, land contract, or other evidence of
ownership of the property for which an exemption is requested if
required by the supervisor or board of review.
(e) Meet the federal poverty guidelines published in the prior
JHM H01408'25 (H-3) b9mag0


calendar year in the Federal Register by the United States
Department of Health and Human Services under its authority to
revise the poverty line under 42 USC 9902, or alternative
guidelines adopted by the governing body of the local assessing
unit provided the alternative guidelines do not provide income
eligibility requirements less than the federal guidelines.
(3) The application for an exemption under this section must
be filed after January 1 but before the day prior to the last day
of the board of review.
(4) The governing body of the local assessing unit shall
determine and make available to the public the policy and
guidelines used for the granting of exemptions under this section.
If the local assessing unit maintains a website, the local
assessing unit shall make the policy and guidelines, and the form
described in subsection (2)(b), available to the public on the
website. The guidelines must include, but are not limited to, the
specific income and asset levels of the claimant and total
household income and assets.
(5) The board of review shall follow the policy and guidelines
of the local assessing unit in granting or denying an exemption
under this section. If a person claiming an exemption under this
section is qualified under the eligibility requirements in
subsection (2), the board of review shall grant the exemption in
whole or in part, as follows:
(a) A full exemption equal to a 100% reduction in taxable
value for the tax year in which the exemption is granted.
(b) A partial exemption equal to 1 of the following:
(i) A 75%, 50%, or 25% reduction in taxable value for the tax
year in which the exemption is granted.
JHM H01408'25 (H-3) b9mag0


(ii) As approved by the state tax commission, any other
percentage reduction in taxable value for the tax year in which the
exemption is granted, applied in a form and manner prescribed by
the state tax commission.
(6) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the
contrary, a local assessing unit may permit by resolution a
principal residence residences exempt from the collection of taxes
under this section in tax year 2019 or 2020, or both, to remain
exempt under this section in subsequent tax years, 2021, 2022, and
2023 without subsequent reapplication for the exemption, subject to
periodic reapplication as provided in subdivision (a), provided
there has not been a change in ownership or occupancy status of the
person eligible for exemption under subsection (2), and may permit
a principal residence exempt for the first time from the collection
of taxes under this section in tax year 2021, 2022, or 2023 to
remain exempt under this section for up to 3 additional years after
its initial year of exempt status without subsequent reapplication
for the exemption, provided there has not been a change in
ownership or occupancy status of the person eligible for exemption
under subsection (2), this section if the person who establishes
initial eligibility under subsection (2) receives a fixed income
solely from public assistance that is not subject to significant
annual increases beyond the rate of inflation, such as federal
Supplemental Security Income or Social Security disability or
retirement benefits. Both All of the following apply to a person
who obtains an extended exemption under this subsection:
(a) The extension continues for not more than 3 years. To
claim a subsequent extension under this section, the person who
obtained the expiring extension must reestablish eligibility for
JHM H01408'25 (H-3) b9mag0


the exemption, at a time and in a form and manner prescribed by the
state tax commission, under the criteria described in subsection
(2)(a) to (e) and the provisions of subsections (3) to (5).
(b) The person who obtained the extension shall annually file
with the March, July, or December board of review a certification
of continuing eligibility for the exemption at a time and in a form
and manner prescribed by the state tax commission. This subdivision
does not apply in a year in which the person reestablishes
eligibility under subdivision (a).
(c) (a) The person who obtained the extension shall file with
the local assessing unit, in a form and manner prescribed by the
state tax commission, an affidavit rescinding the exemption as
extended under this subsection within 45 days after either of the
following, if applicable:
(i) The person ceases to own or occupy the principal residence
for which the exemption was extended.
(ii) The person experiences a change in household assets or
income that defeats eligibility for the exemption under subsection
(2).
(d) (b) If the person who obtained the extension fails to file
a rescission as required under subdivision (a) (c)(ii) and the
property is later determined to be ineligible for the exemption
under this section, extension under subdivision (c)(ii), the person
is subject to repayment of any additional taxes with interest as
described in this subdivision. Upon discovery that the property is
no longer eligible for the exemption under this section, extension
under subdivision (c)(ii), the assessor shall remove the exemption
of that property and, if the tax roll is in the local tax
collecting unit's possession, amend the tax roll to reflect the
JHM H01408'25 (H-3) b9mag0


removal of the exemption, and the local treasurer shall, within 30
days of the date of the discovery, issue a corrected tax bill for
any additional taxes with interest at the rate of 1% per month or
fraction of a month computed from the date the taxes were last
payable without interest. If the tax roll is in the county
treasurer's possession, the tax roll must be amended to reflect the
removal of the exemption and the county treasurer shall, within 30
days of the date of the removal, prepare and submit a supplemental
tax bill for any additional taxes, together with interest at the
rate of 1% per month or fraction of a month computed from the date
the taxes were last payable without interest. Interest on any tax
set forth in a corrected or supplemental tax bill again begins to
accrue 60 days after the date the corrected or supplemental tax
bill is issued at the rate of 1% per month or fraction of a month.
Taxes levied in a corrected or supplemental tax bill must be
returned as delinquent on the March 1 in the year immediately
succeeding the year in which the corrected or supplemental tax bill
is issued.
(e) If the person who obtained the extension fails to file a
rescission as required under subdivision (c)(i), and the property is
later determined to be ineligible for the extension under this
subsection, the assessor shall remove the exemption of that
property effective on the December 31 following the determination
of ineligibility.
(7) A person who files a claim under this section is not
prohibited from also appealing the assessment on the property for
which that claim is made before the board of review in the same
year.
(8) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the
JHM H01408'25 (H-3) b9mag0


contrary, if the assessor determines that a principal residence of
a person by reason of poverty is still eligible for the exemption
under this section and the property was exempt from the collection
of taxes under this section in tax year 2022, the property will
remain exempt from the collection of taxes under this section
through tax year 2023 if, on or before December 1, 2023, the
governing body of the local assessing unit in which the principal
residence is located adopts a resolution that continues the
exemption through tax year 2023 for all principal residences within
the local assessing unit that were exempt from the collection of
taxes under this section in tax year 2022. The local assessing unit
may require the owner of a principal residence exempt from the
collection of taxes under this subsection to affirm ownership,
poverty, and occupancy status in writing by filing with the local
assessing unit the form prescribed by the state tax commission
under subsection (2)(a).
(8) (9) A local assessing unit that adopts a resolution under
subsection (6) or (8) must develop and implement an audit program
that includes, but is not limited to, the audit of all information
filed under subsection (2). If property is determined to be the
assessor determines that the property is ineligible for exemption
as a result of an audit, the person who filed for the exemption
under subsection (2) is subject to repayment of additional taxes
including interest to be paid as provided in subsection (6)(b).
(6)(d). The state tax commission shall issue a bulletin providing
further guidance to local assessing units on the development and
implementation of an audit program under this subsection.
(9) (10) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the
contrary, if an exemption was not on the assessment roll and was
JHM H01408'25 (H-3) b9mag0


not denied, the July or December board of review shall grant an
exemption under this section, in whole or in part as described in
subsection (5), for the immediately preceding tax year on the
principal residence of a person who establishes eligibility in that
tax year under the criteria described in subsection (2). A claim of
exemption under this subsection must be filed with the board of
review on a form prescribed by the state tax commission and
provided by the local assessing unit, accompanied by supporting
documentation establishing eligibility for the exemption for the
immediately preceding tax year and any additional supporting
documentation as may be required by the state tax commission. The
local assessing unit shall notify the department of treasury, in a
form and manner prescribed by the department of treasury, of each
exemption granted under this subsection by the board of review for
the immediately preceding tax year.
(10) (11) As used in this section, "principal residence" means
principal residence or qualified agricultural property as those
terms are defined in section 7dd.
Final Page
JHM H01408'25 (H-3) b9mag0